Nevada, session 83, AB212.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Section 3 of the Virtual Early Childhood Family
Engagement Pilot Program, being chapter 485, Statutes of Nevada
2023, at page 2981, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 3. “Program” means the Virtual Early Childhood
Family Engagement [Pilot] Program created by section 4 of
this act.
Sec. 2. Section 4 of the Virtual Early Childhood Family
Engagement Pilot Program, being chapter 485, Statutes of Nevada
2023, at page 2981, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 4. 1. The Virtual Early Childhood Family
Engagement [Pilot] Program is hereby created within the
Department.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. The purposes of the Program are to:
(a) Provide training and coaching to empower parents and
guardians of young children in the education of their child;
and
(b) Increase the readiness of children for kindergarten in
every geographic area of this State.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. Section 7 of the Virtual Early Childhood Family
Engagement Pilot Program, being chapter 485, Statutes of Nevada
2023, at page 2983, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 7. 1. On or before July 30, [2024,] 2025, July 30,
2026, and July 30, [2025,] 2027, the organization selected to
administer the Program pursuant to section 5 of this act shall
submit a report to the Department which includes, without
limitation:
(a) The number of children enrolled in the Program
during the immediately preceding school year, in total and in
each county of this State;
(b) The number and percentage of children described in
paragraph (a) who meet each criterion identified in paragraph
(a) of subsection 2 of section 6 of this act;
(c) The demographics of the children enrolled in the
Program, if known, including, without limitation:
(1) Race;
(2) Ethnicity;
(3) Disability status;
(4) Household income;
(5) County of residence; and
(6) Language spoken at home;
(d) Quantitative data and, to the extent any is available,
qualitative data that demonstrates the effectiveness of the
Program at improving the abilities of a child in reading,
writing and mathematics and the readiness of the children
participating in the Program for kindergarten, including,
without limitation:
(1) Data concerning the educational development of
the children participating in the Program;
(2) The number of children who completed the
Program and who are ready for kindergarten; and
(3) Data concerning the level of satisfaction that
parents, guardians and foster parents have concerning the
Program; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(e) Any additional information determined by the
Department to be necessary to evaluate the Program.
2. On or before September 30, [2024,] 2025,
September 30, 2026, and September 30, [2025,] 2027, the
Department shall compile a report of the data reported
pursuant to subsection 1 and submit the report to the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(a) In 2025, the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education and the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Health and Human Services;
(b) In [2024,] 2026, the next regular session of the
Legislature; and
[(b)] (c) In [2025,] 2027, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education and the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services.
Sec. 5. Section 9 of chapter 485, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at
page 2984, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 9. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2023, and
expires by limitation on September 30, [2025.] 2027.
Sec. 6. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services to
continue to implement the Virtual Early Childhood Family
Engagement Program the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,000,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)